Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4318.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 21A, of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after Section 28 the following new section:
Section 29: Extended Producer Responsibility for Offshore Wind Energy Equipment
Section 29 (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
meanings, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
‘’ Department ‘’, the Department of Environmental Protection.
''Producer'', an offshore wind company, or a manufacturer, importer, distributor, or
retailer of offshore wind energy equipment.
''Offshore wind company'', a business corporation, partnership, firm, unincorporated
association or other entity engaged in offshore wind development, manufacturing or
of 5

commercialization in the commonwealth and any affiliate thereof, which is, or the members of
which are, subject to taxation under chapter 62, 63, 64H or 64I.
''Offshore wind energy equipment'', all machinery, parts, components, and infrastructure
used in the production, installation, operation, and maintenance of wind energy systems,
including but not limited to wind turbines, blades, nacelles, towers, and other structural
components, as well as associated electrical and mechanical systems, that has emerged into the
market or been placed into service from a location within the borders of the Commonwealth of
Massachusetts, or that is used in any offshore wind facility that generates and provides electricity
pursuant to an agreement with the Commonwealth of Massachusetts.
''Offshore Wind facility'', an offshore facility that uses wind to generate electricity.
''Producer Responsibility Organization'', a business corporation, partnership, firm,
unincorporated association, or other entity designated by producers to carry out their obligations
under this Act.
''Recycling'', the processing of offshore wind energy equipment to recover materials for
reuse, including the recycling of composite blades, metals, and other materials that comprise
wind turbines and related equipment.
''Producer Responsibility Agreement'', a contract executed under the pains and penalties
of perjury by a person authorized to act on behalf of an offshore wind company, specifying the
obligations related to the collection, recycling, or disposal of offshore wind energy equipment at
the end of its useful life.
of 5

''Extended Producer Responsibility Program'', a regulatory framework to oversee and
enforce the obligations of producers of offshore wind energy equipment throughout the lifecycle
of their products, including the establishment and annual review of recycling targets.
(b) The department shall implement an extended producer responsibility program for the
management and recycling of offshore wind energy equipment, including but not limited to
turbines, blades, and related infrastructure. The program shall be designed to ensure the safe
disposal, reuse, or recycling of equipment at the end of its useful life, promote resource recovery,
and reduce environmental impact.
(c) The department shall establish recycling rate targets for offshore wind energy
equipment, including specific goals for the recycling of composite blades, metals, and other
materials. These targets shall be reviewed and, if necessary, revised annually to reflect the latest
advancements and challenges in recycling technologies and market conditions.
(d) Producers of offshore wind energy equipment are hereby required to ensure the
collection, recycling, or proper disposal of wind energy equipment at the end of its useful life.
This obligation encompasses all components including, but not limited to, blades, towers,
nacelles, and other parts, which shall be recycled, reused, or disposed of in a manner that adheres
strictly to environmentally responsible practices.
(e) Every producer must designate a Producer Responsibility Organization (PRO) to
manage and fulfill the obligations stipulated under this Act. The designation shall be made in
writing, signed under the pains and penalties of perjury, by an individual who is expressly
authorized to enter into contracts on behalf of the offshore wind energy company.
of 5

(f) Upon the designation of a Producer Responsibility Organization, an executed
Producer Responsibility Agreement shall be required. This agreement shall detail the specific
obligations and procedures for the collection, recycling, and disposal of wind energy equipment
and must be signed under the pains and penalties of perjury by a person expressly authorized to
contract on behalf of the offshore wind company. The executed agreement shall be maintained as
a binding document, enforceable under this Act.
(g) The department is hereby granted the authority to execute Producer Responsibility
Agreements with offshore wind energy producers and their designated Producer Responsibility
Organizations. The department is also empowered to enforce all provisions of these agreements
and this Act, including the authority to impose penalties for non-compliance.
(h) The obligations of the Producer Responsibility Organization under this Act are
perpetual and shall not cease notwithstanding the dissolution or cessation of the producer entity.
(i) In the event that a producer entity dissolves or otherwise ceases to exist, the Producer
Responsibility Organization will continue to be responsible for the fulfillment of obligations
under this Act.
(j) The Producer Responsibility Organization shall at all times maintain at least one
responsible party expressly designated to manage compliance with the obligations under this
Act. The Producer Responsibility Organization shall provide to the department the name,
address, and contact information of the responsible party, and shall show proof of the responsible
party’s consent to being so named.
of 5

(k)Should the Producer Responsibility Organization dissolve or cease to exist, the
responsible party on record shall assume direct responsibility for continuing the obligations
prescribed by this Act until a new Producer Responsibility Organization is designated.
(l) The responsibilities created by establishing an extended producer responsibility
program for offshore wind energy equipment shall be in addition to any other responsibilities
imposed by any other general or special law or rule or regulation and shall not diminish or
reduce any power or authority of the department.
(m)Notwithstanding any general or special law or regulation to the contrary, any
information required by the department of energy resources or the department of any
participating offshore wind company, shall be deemed to be a public record as defined in clause
Twenty-sixth of section 7 of chapter 4 and shall be subject to demand for production under
section 10 of chapter 66.
of 5